Georgia, session 2025_26, HB544.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 20-2-310 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to student
directory information, registering to vote and with selective service, and pledge of allegiance,
is amended by revising subsection (b) as follows:
"(b)(1) Each eligible student in the public schools of this state shall be apprised of his or
her right to register as an elector and to vote in elections and of any obligation to register
with the Selective Service System. Each eligible student shall be given an opportunity,
arranged by the school administration, to register to vote at his or her school during the
month of April of each year. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules and
H. B. 544
- 1 -

LC 61 0134
regulations to carry out this Code section. An excused absence of a student to register or
vote, at the discretion of the local unit of administration, shall not exceed one school day.
(2)(A) There is established the Jimmy Carter Award for Civic Engagement to
recognize public schools at which a high percentage of eligible students are registered
to vote. In order to qualify for the Jimmy Carter Award for Civic Engagement, a public
school shall meet the following criteria:
(i) For a gold level award, 100 percent of eligible students at such public school shall
be registered to vote; or
(ii) For a silver level award, 85 percent of eligible students at such public school shall
be registered to vote.
(B) The Department of Education shall develop policies and procedures to recognize
public schools which meet the criteria for an award pursuant to this paragraph."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 544
- 2 -